Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1329.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7507.1(a)(3), (b) and (e) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7507.1. Invasion of privacy.(a) Offense defined.--Except as set forth in subsection (d), a person commits the offense of invasion of privacy if he, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person, knowingly does any of the following:* * *(3) Transfers or transmits an image or video obtained in violation of paragraph (1) or (2) by live or recorded telephone message, electronic mail or the Internet or by any other transfer of the medium on which the image is stored.* * *123456789101112131415161718 (b) Grading.--[Invasion] A violation of this section shall be graded as follows:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), invasion of privacy is a misdemeanor of the second degree if there is more than one violation. Otherwise, a violation of this section is a misdemeanor of the third degree. The grading under this paragraph shall also apply if both the victim and the offender are minors.(2) If the offender is a teacher and the victim is a student or the offender is an adult and the victim is a minor, a violation of this section is:(i) A felony of the third degree for a first violation.(ii) A felony of the second degree for a second or subsequent violation.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Full or partial nudity." Display of all or any part of the human genitals or pubic area or buttocks, or any part of the nipple of the breast of any female person, with less than a fully opaque covering."Intimate part." Any part of:(1) the human genitals, pubic area or buttocks; and(2) the nipple of a female breast."Photographs" or "films." Making any photograph, motion picture film, videotape or any other recording or transmission of the image of a person."Place where a person would have a reasonable expectation of 20250HB1329PN1529 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 privacy." A location where a reasonable person would believe that he could disrobe in privacy without being concerned that his undressing was being viewed, photographed or filmed by another."Student." An individual enrolled and receiving instruction at a public or private school within this Commonwealth in prekindergarten through grade twelve or who is receiving transitional service training before attaining 21 years of age."Teacher." A professional employee, temporary professional employee, substitute or instructor in a public or private school within this Commonwealth who provides instruction to students in prekindergarten through grade twelve or who is receiving transitional service training before attaining 21 years of age."Views." Looking upon another person with the unaided eye or with any device designed or intended to improve visual acuity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1329PN1529 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516